Utah statutes.
32B-11-203.   Application requirements for a manufacturing license.

To obtain an alcoholic product manufacturing license, a person shall submit to the department:

(1)  a written application in a form prescribed by the department;

(2)  a nonrefundable application fee of $300;

(3)  an initial license fee of $3,800:

(a)  unless otherwise provided in this chapter; and

(b)  that is refundable if a license is not issued;

(4)  written consent of the local authority;

(5)  a statement of the purpose for which the person has applied for the manufacturing license;

(6)  evidence that the person is authorized by the United States to manufacture an alcoholic product;

(7)  a bond as specified by Section 32B-11-207;

(8)  evidence that the person is carrying public liability insurance in an amount and form satisfactory to the department;

(9)  a signed consent form stating that the manufacturing licensee will permit any authorized representative of the commission, department, or any law enforcement officer to have unrestricted right to enter the licensed premises;

(10)  if the person is an entity, proper verification evidencing that a person who signs the application is authorized to sign on behalf of the entity; and

(11)  any other information the commission or department may require.



Amended by Chapter 334, 2011 General Session

